Florida, session 2026, HB313.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
39
40 Section 1. Section 83.471, Florida Statutes, is created to
41 read:
42 83.471 Reusable tenant screening reports.—
43 (1) As used in this section, the term:
44 (a)1. "Consumer report" means any written, oral, or other
45 communication of information by a consumer reporting agency
46 bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing,
47 credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
48 characteristics, or mode of living which is used or expected to
49 be used or collected in whole or in part for the purpose of
50 serving as a factor in establishing the consumer's eligibility
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
51 for credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal,
52 family, or household purposes; employment purposes; or any other
53 purpose authorized under 15 U.S.C. s. 1681b.
54 2. Except for the restrictions provided in 15 U.S.C. s.
55 1681a(d)(3), the term "consumer report" does not include:
56 a. Subject to 15 U.S.C. s. 1681s-3, any report containing
57 information solely as to transactions or experiences between the
58 consumer and the person making the report; communication of such
59 information among persons related by common ownership or
60 affiliated by corporate control; or communication of other
61 information among persons related by common ownership or
62 affiliated by corporate control, if it is clearly and
63 conspicuously disclosed to the consumer that the information may
64 be communicated among such persons and the consumer is given the
65 opportunity, before the time that the information is initially
66 communicated, to direct that such information not be
67 communicated among such persons;
68 b. Any authorization or approval of a specific extension
69 of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card
70 or similar device;
71 c. Any report in which a person who has been requested by
72 a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or
73 indirectly to a consumer conveys his or her decision with
74 respect to such request if the third party advises the consumer
75 of the name and address of the person to whom the request was
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
76 made, and such person makes the disclosures to the consumer
77 required under 15 U.S.C. s. 1681m; or
78 d. A communication described in 15 U.S.C. s. 1681a(o) or
79 15 U.S.C. s. 1681a(x).
80 (b) "Consumer reporting agency" means any person who, for
81 monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis,
82 regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of
83 assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other
84 information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer
85 reports to third parties, and who uses any means or facility of
86 interstate commerce for the purpose of preparing or furnishing
87 consumer reports.
88 (c) "Reusable tenant screening report" means a report
89 that:
90 1. Includes all of the following:
91 a. The applicant's full name.
92 b. The applicant's contact information, including mailing
93 address, e-mail address, and telephone number.
94 c. Verification of the applicant's employment.
95 d. The applicant's last known address.
96 e. The results of an eviction history check in a manner
97 and for a period of time consistent with applicable law related
98 to the consideration of eviction history in housing.
99 f. The date through which the information contained in the
100 report is current.
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
101 g. The applicant's consumer report.
102 2.a. Is prepared within the previous 30 days by a consumer
103 reporting agency at the request and expense of an applicant.
104 b. Is made directly available to a landlord for use in the
105 rental application process or is provided through a third-party
106 website that regularly engages in the business of providing a
107 reusable tenant screening report and complies with all state and
108 federal laws pertaining to use and disclosure of information
109 contained in a consumer report by a consumer reporting agency.
110 c. Is available to the landlord at no cost to access or
111 use.
112 (2) A landlord may accept reusable tenant screening
113 reports and may require an applicant to state that there has not
114 been a material change to the information in the reusable tenant
115 screening report.
116 (3) If an applicant provides a reusable tenant screening
117 report to a landlord who accepts such reports, the landlord may
118 not charge the applicant a fee to access the report or an
119 application screening fee.
120 (4) This section does not:
121 (a) Affect any other applicable law related to the
122 consideration of criminal history information in housing,
123 including, but not limited to, local ordinances governing the
124 information that landlords may review and consider when
125 determining to whom they will rent; or
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
126 (b) Require a landlord to accept reusable tenant screening
127 reports.
128 Section 2. Subsections (3), (4), and (5) of section
129 163.31771, Florida Statutes, are amended, paragraph (h) is added
130 to subsection (2) of that section, and a new subsection (5) is
131 added to that section, to read:
132 163.31771 Accessory dwelling units.—
133 (2) As used in this section, the term:
134 (h) "Primary dwelling unit" means the existing or proposed
135 single-family dwelling on the property where a proposed
136 accessory dwelling unit would be located.
137 (3) By December 1, 2026, a local government shall may
138 adopt an ordinance to allow accessory dwelling units in any area
139 zoned for single-family residential use. Such ordinance must
140 apply prospectively to accessory dwelling units approved after
141 the date the ordinance is adopted. Such ordinance may regulate
142 the permitting, construction, and use of an accessory dwelling
143 unit but may not do any of the following:
144 (a) Prohibit the renting or leasing of an accessory
145 dwelling unit, except to prohibit the renting or leasing of an
146 accessory dwelling unit approved after the effective date of the
147 ordinance for a term of less than 1 month, notwithstanding s.
148 509.032(7)(b).
149 (b) Require that the owner of a parcel on which an
150 accessory dwelling unit is constructed reside in the primary
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
151 dwelling unit.
152 (c) Increase parking requirements on any parcel that can
153 accommodate an additional motor vehicle on a driveway without
154 impeding access to the primary dwelling unit.
155 (d) Require replacement parking if a garage, carport, or
156 covered parking structure is converted to create an accessory
157 dwelling unit.
158 (4) An application for a building permit to construct an
159 accessory dwelling unit must include an affidavit from the
160 applicant which attests that the unit will be rented at an
161 affordable rate to an extremely-low-income, very-low-income,
162 low-income, or moderate-income person or persons.
163 (5) Each accessory dwelling unit allowed by an ordinance
164 adopted under this section which provides affordable rental
165 housing shall apply toward satisfying the affordable housing
166 component of the housing element in the local government's
167 comprehensive plan under s. 163.3177(6)(f).
168 (5) The owner of a property with an accessory dwelling
169 unit may not be denied a homestead exemption for those portions
170 of property on which the owner maintains a permanent residence
171 solely on the basis of the property containing an accessory
172 dwelling unit that is or may be rented to another person.
173 However, if the accessory dwelling unit is rented to another
174 person, the accessory dwelling unit must be assessed separately
175 from the homestead property and taxed according to its use.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
176 Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 420.615, Florida
177 Statutes, is amended to read:
178 420.615 Affordable housing land donation density bonus
179 incentives.—
180 (1) A local government may provide density bonus
181 incentives pursuant to the provisions of this section to any
182 landowner who voluntarily donates fee simple interest in real
183 property to the local government for the purpose of assisting
184 the local government in providing affordable housing, including
185 housing that is affordable for military families receiving the
186 basic allowance for housing. Donated real property must be
187 determined by the local government to be appropriate for use as
188 affordable housing and must be subject to deed restrictions to
189 ensure that the property will be used for affordable housing.
190 Section 4. The Office of Program Policy Analysis and
191 Government Accountability (OPPAGA) shall evaluate the efficacy
192 of using mezzanine finance, or second-position short-term debt,
193 to stimulate the construction of owner-occupied housing that is
194 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004(3), Florida Statutes, in
195 this state. OPPAGA shall also evaluate the potential of tiny
196 homes in meeting the need for affordable housing in this state.
197 OPPAGA shall consult with the Florida Housing Finance
198 Corporation and the Shimberg Center for Housing Studies at the
199 University of Florida in conducting its evaluation. By December
200 31, 2027, OPPAGA shall submit a report of its findings to the
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 313 2026
201 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
202 Representatives. Such report must include recommendations for
203 the structuring of a model mezzanine finance program.
204 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb313-00